Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA HISTORICAL SOCIETY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $21,620,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for the purposes specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Historic sites asset preservation. new text end new text begin $13,670,000 of the appropriation in subdivision 1 is for capital improvements and betterments at state historic sites, buildings, landscaping at historic buildings, exhibits, markers, and monuments, to be spent in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307. The society shall determine project priorities as appropriate based on need. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minnesota History Center facility enhancements. new text end new text begin $6,700,000 of the appropriation in subdivision 1 is to design enhancements to the Minnesota History Center and other Minnesota Historical Society properties to serve the public through preservation and access to historical collections and public program activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin County and local historic preservation grants. new text end new text begin $1,250,000 of the appropriation in subdivision 1 is for grants to county and local jurisdictions as matching money for historic preservation projects of a capital nature, as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 138.0525. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $21,620,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end